Washington statutes.
RCW 10.25.140

Change of venue by outside jury.

When a change of venue is ordered and the court, upon motion to transfer a jury or in the absence of such motion, determines that it would be more economical to move the jury than to move the pending action and that justice will be served, a change of venue shall be accomplished by the selection of a jury in the county to which the venue would otherwise have been transferred and the selected jury moved to the county where the indictment or information was filed.

[ 1981 c 205 s 1.]